fi: Tavaraverkon säädettävyys: Säädettävät koukut; Säädettävät hihnat; Kiristysnauha/nauhalukko; Useita kiinnityskohtia; Ei säädettävä; Kiristyssoljet; Muu
hu: Raktérháló állíthatósága: Állítható kampók; Állítható pántok; Összehúzó zsinór/zsinórrögzítő; Több rögzítési pont; Nem állítható; Feszítőcsatok; Egyéb
hr-HR: Podesivost mreže za teret: Podesive kuke; Podesive trake; Vezica / stoper za uže; Više položaja za sidrenje; Nepodesivo; Kopče za zatezanje; Ostalo
es: Ajustabilidad de la red de carga: Ganchos ajustables; Correas ajustables; Cordón ajustable/cierre de cordón; Múltiples posiciones de anclaje; No ajustable; Hebillas tensoras; Otro
cs: Nastavitelnost nákladové sítě: Nastavitelné háky; Nastavitelné popruhy; Stahovací šňůrka / brzdička; Více kotevních bodů; Nenastavitelné; Napínací přezky; Jiné
tr: Yük ağı ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir kancalar; Ayarlanabilir kayışlar; Büzme ipi/kordon kilidi; Çoklu bağlantı noktaları; Ayarlanamaz; Gerdirme tokaları; Diğer
ro-RO: Reglarea plasei de marfă: Cârlige ajustabile; Curele ajustabile; Șnur/opritor șnur; Poziții multiple de ancorare; Neajustabil; Catarame de tensionare; Altele
el: Ρύθμιση καθαρού φορτίου: Ρυθμιζόμενοι γάντζοι; Ρυθμιζόμενοι ιμάντες; Κορδόνι περίσφιξης/ασφάλεια κορδονιού; Πολλαπλές θέσεις αγκύρωσης; Μη ρυθμιζόμενο; Αγκράφες τάνυσης; Άλλο
sv: Lastnätets justerbarhet: Justerbara krokar; Justerbara remmar; Dragsko/snörlås; Flera förankringspositioner; Ej justerbar; Spännspännen; Annat
de: Verstellbarkeit des Laderaumnetzes: Verstellbare Haken; Verstellbare Gurte; Kordelzug/Kordelstopper; Mehrere Verankerungspositionen; Nicht verstellbar; Spannschnallen; Sonstige
pl: Regulacja siatki bagażowej: Regulowane haki; Regulowane paski; Ściągacz ze stoperem; Wiele punktów mocowania; Nieregulowane; Klamry napinające; Inne
da: Justerbarhed af lastnet: Justerbare kroge; Justerbare stropper; Snøretræk/snorelås; Flere forankringspositioner; Ikke-justerbar; Spændespænder; Andet
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh lưới chở hàng: Móc có thể điều chỉnh; Dây đai có thể điều chỉnh; Dây rút/khóa dây; Nhiều vị trí neo; Không thể điều chỉnh; Khóa căng dây; Khác
th: ความสามารถในการปรับระดับของตาข่ายบรรทุกสินค้า: ตะขอปรับได้; สายรัดปรับได้; เชือกรูด/ตัวล็อกเชือก; ตำแหน่งยึดหลายจุด; ปรับไม่ได้; หัวเข็มขัดปรับความตึง; อื่นๆ
it: Regolabilità della rete di carico: Ganci regolabili; Cinghie regolabili; Coulisse/fermacorda; Posizioni di ancoraggio multiple; Non regolabile; Fibbie di tensionamento; Altro
nl: Laadnet verstelbaarheid: Verstelbare haken; Verstelbare banden; Trekkoord/koordstopper; Meerdere ankerposities; Niet verstelbaar; Spangespen; Overige
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť siete na batožinu: Nastaviteľné háčiky; Nastaviteľné popruhy; Sťahovacia šnúrka/brzdička; Viaceré kotviace polohy; Nenastaviteľné; Napínacie pracky; Iné
nb: Justerbar lastenett: Justerbare kroker; Justerbare stropper; Snøring/snorlås; Flere forankringsposisjoner; Ikke justerbar; Strammespenner; Annet
ja: 荷台ネットの調整機能: 調整可能なフック; 調整可能なストラップ; ドローストリング/コードロック; 複数のアンカー位置; 調整不可; テンションバックル; その他
fr: Réglage du filet de chargement: Crochets ajustables; Sangles ajustables; Cordon de serrage/bloque-cordon; Positions d’ancrage multiples; Non ajustable; Boucles de tension; Autre
ko: 화물망 조절 기능: 조절 가능 후크; 조절 가능 스트랩; 조임끈/코드 락; 다중 앵커 위치; 조절 불가; 텐셔닝 버클; 기타
zh-TW: 捆貨網可調節性: 可調式掛鉤; 可調式背帶; 抽繩/繩扣; 多個固定位置; 不可調; 張緊扣; 其他
lt-LT: Krovinio tinklo reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojami kabliukai; Reguliuojami dirželiai; Sutraukiama virvelė / fiksatorius; Keli tvirtinimo taškai; Nereguliuojamas; Įtempimo sagtys; Kita
en: Cargo net adjustability: Adjustable hooks; Adjustable straps; Drawstring/cord lock; Multiple anchor positions; Non-adjustable; Tensioning buckles; Other
zh-CN: 后备箱网兜可调性: 可调节挂钩; 可调节绑带; 抽绳/绳扣; 多锚点位置; 不可调节; 张力调节扣; 其他
pt-PT: Ajuste da rede de carga: Ganchos ajustáveis; Alças ajustáveis; Fecho de cordão; Várias posições de fixação; Não ajustável; Fivelas tensoras; Outra
bg-BG: Регулируемост на товарната мрежа: Регулируеми куки; Регулируеми ремъци; Връв/стопер; Множество позиции за закрепване; Нерегулируема; Обтягащи катарами; Друго
pt-BR: Ajuste da rede de carga: Ganchos ajustáveis; Tiras ajustáveis; Cordão/trava de cordão; Várias posições de ancoragem; Não ajustável; Fivelas de tensionamento; Outro
sl-SI: Nastavljivost tovorne mreže: Nastavljivi kavlji; Nastavljivi trakovi; Zatezna vrvica/zapora vrvice; Več pritrdilnih mest; Nenastavljivo; Napenjalne zaponke; Drugo
ru: Регулируемость багажной сетки: Регулируемые крючки; Регулируемые ремни; Шнурок/замок на шнурке; Несколько точек крепления; Нерегулируемая; Натяжные пряжки; Другое